Utah statutes.
32B-2-303.   Purchase of liquor.

(1)  The department may not purchase or stock spirituous liquor in a container smaller than 200 milliliters, except as otherwise allowed by the commission.

(2) (a)  An order by the department for the purchase of liquor, or a cancellation by the department of an order of liquor:

(i)  shall be executed in writing by the department; and

(ii)  is not valid or binding unless executed in writing.

(b)  The department shall maintain a copy of an order or cancellation on file for at least three years.

(c)  An electronic record satisfies Subsections (2)(a) and (b) pursuant to Title 46, Chapter 4, Uniform Electronic Transactions Act.



Amended by Chapter 307, 2011 General Session

